District of Columbia statutes.
50-211.03

Not funded

Program establishment

[Not funded].

Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-223, § 103, 59 DCR 13537
This section is referenced in § 50-211.02.
Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-223 provided that §§ 103, 105(c), and 201(d) of the act shall apply upon the inclusion of their fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan.